District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.108

Effect of invalidity of part of subchapter.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 306, Pub. L. 87-569, § 108
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-301.108.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.10.
1973 Ed., § 29-1099i.

Prior Codifications